Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.600 and 2010 c 8 s 9072 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((No))(a) Except as provided under (b) of this subsection, no person driving or in charge of a motor vehicle shall permit it to stand unattended without first stopping the engine, locking the ignition, removing the key and effectively setting the brake thereon and, when standing upon any perceptible grade, turning the front wheels to the curb or side of the highway.(b) A person driving or in charge of a motor vehicle may permit it to stand unattended with the engine running, doors locked, brake effectively set, and when standing upon any perceptible grade, front wheels turned to the curb or side of the highway, for no longer than 30 minutes, if reasonably necessary for the purpose of employing the vehicle's air conditioning equipment or heating system to limit exposure to excessive heat or cold for any pet present in the vehicle. For purposes of this subsection, "pet" means a dog, cat, or any animal that has been domesticated, except livestock.(2) The most recent driver of a motor vehicle which the driver has left standing unattended, who learns that the vehicle has become set in motion and has struck another vehicle or property, or has caused injury to any person, shall comply with the requirements of:(a) RCW 46.52.010 if his or her vehicle strikes an unattended vehicle or property adjacent to a public highway; or(b) RCW 46.52.020 if his or her vehicle causes damage to an attended vehicle or other property or injury to any person.(3) Any person failing to comply with subsection (2)(b) of this section shall be subject to the sanctions set forth in RCW 46.52.020.--- END ---